Washington statutes.
RCW 24.46.020

Application for permission to establish, operate and maintain foreign trade zones authorized.

A nonprofit corporation or organization, as zone sponsor, may apply to the United States for permission to establish, operate, and maintain foreign trade zones: PROVIDED, That nothing herein shall be construed to prevent these zones from being operated and financed by a private corporation(s) on behalf of said nonprofit corporation acting as zone sponsor.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 196 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1977 ex.s. c 196: See note following RCW 24.46.010.